src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/exceptions_gt-norm.yaml
# yaml test generated from src/morphology/stems/exceptions.lexc with doccomments2yaml.awk
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst

Tests:
  EXCEPTIONS: #
    olla+V+Act+Pot+ConNeg: lie # 
    olla+V+Der/ja+Sg+Nom: olija # 
    ei+V+Neg+Act+Sg1: en # 
    ei+V+Neg+Act+Imprt+Pl2: älkää # 
    ei+V+Neg+Act+Imprt+Pl3: älkööt # 
    kutiaa+V: kutiaa # 
    taita+V: taita # 
    paratkoon+V: paratkoon # 
    eläköön+V: eläköön # 
    ruoka+N+Sg+Ine: ruuassa # 
    ruoka+N+Pl+Ade: ruuilla # 
    hyvä+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: parempi # 
    hyvä+A+Comp+Pl+Ine: paremmissa # 
    hyvä+A+Sup+Sg+Nom: paras # 
    hyvä+A+Sup+Pl+Nom: parhaat # 
    vuosi+N+Sg+Ess: vuonna # 
    sydän+N+Sg+Ess: sydännä # 
    jumala+N+Pl+Gen: jumalten # 
    sankari+N+Pl+Gen: sankarten # 
